Mississippi, session 2026, HB4115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The governing authorities of the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, are authorized, in their discretion, to enter into a long-term lease agreement for a term not to exceed thirty (30) years for the leasing of city-owned property. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.